utilities/dictionaries/lv_LV-Latvian.aff
SFX F  ukt  ūciet  ukt   is:2dttp
SFX F  ukt  ūkot   ukt   is:0xtta
SFX F  ukt  ūk/]|  ukt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  ilkt  elku   [i]lkt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  ilkt  elc    [i]lkt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  ilkt  elk    [i]lkt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  ilkt  elkam  [i]lkt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  ilkt  elkat  [i]lkt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  ilkt  elciet [i]lkt   is:2dttp
SFX F  ilkt  elkot  [i]lkt   is:0xtta
SFX F  ilkt  elk/]| [i]lkt   is:0xttv
SFX F  t   stu     [a]lkt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  t   sti     [a]lkt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  t   st      [a]lkt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  t   stam    [a]lkt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  t   stat    [a]lkt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  t   stot    [a]lkt   is:0xtta
SFX F  t   stiet   [a]lkt   is:2dttp
SFX F  t   st/]|   [a]lkt   is:0xttv
SFX F  irkt  ērku    irkt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  irkt  ērc     irkt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  irkt  ērk     irkt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  irkt  ērkam   irkt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  irkt  ērkat   irkt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  irkt  ērciet  irkt   is:2dttp
SFX F  irkt  ērkot   irkt   is:0xtta
SFX F  irkt  ērk/]|  irkt   is:0xttv
SFX F  t   stu   [^air]pt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  t   sti   [^air]pt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  t   st    [^air]pt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  t   stam  [^air]pt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  t   stat  [^air]pt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  t   stot  [^air]pt   is:0xtta
SFX F  t   stiet [^air]pt   is:2dttp
SFX F  t   st/]| [^air]pt   is:0xttv
SFX F  ipt  īpu    ipt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  ipt  īpi    ipt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  ipt  īp     ipt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  ipt  īpam   ipt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  ipt  īpat   ipt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  ipt  īpiet  ipt   is:2dttp
SFX F  ipt  īpot   ipt   is:0xtta
SFX F  ipt  īp/]|  ipt   is:0xttv
SFX F  apt  opu    apt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  apt  opi    apt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  apt  op     apt   is:3xtt0
SFX F  apt  opam   apt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  apt  opat   apt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  apt  opiet  apt   is:2dttp
SFX F  apt  opot   apt   is:0xtta
SFX F  apt  op/]|  apt   is:0xttv
SFX F  irpt  ērpu   irpt   is:1vtt0
SFX F  irpt  ērp    irpt   is:2vtt0
SFX F  irpt  ērpam  irpt   is:1dtt0
SFX F  irpt  ērpat  irpt   is:2dtt0
SFX F  irpt  ērpiet irpt   is:2dttp
SFX F  irpt  ērpot  irpt   is:0xtta
SFX F  irpt  ērp/]| irpt   is:0xttv
SFX F  t  nu   et   is:1vtt0
SFX F  t  n    et   is:2vtt0
SFX F  t  nam  et   is:1dtt0
SFX F  t  nat  et   is:2dtt0
SFX F  t  niet et   is:2dttp
SFX F  t  not  et   is:0xtta
SFX F  t  n/]| et   is:0xttv
SFX F  t  du   ot   is:1vtt0
SFX F  t  d    ot   is:2vtt0
SFX F  t  dam  ot   is:1dtt0
SFX F  t  dat  ot   is:2dtt0
SFX F  t  diet ot   is:2dttp
SFX F  t  dot  ot   is:0xtta
SFX F  t  d/]| ot   is:0xttv

SFX G Y 30
SFX G  t  stu   īt  is:1vtt0
SFX G  t  sti   īt  is:2vtt0
SFX G  t  st    īt  is:3vtt0
SFX G  t  stam  īt  is:1dtt0
SFX G  t  stat  īt  is:2dtt0
SFX G  t  stiet īt  is:2dttp
SFX G  t  stot  īt  is:0xtta
SFX G  t  st/]| īt  is:0xttv
SFX G  t  0    st  is:0vtt0
SFX G  t  am   st  is:1dtt0
SFX G  t  at   st  is:2dtt0
SFX G  t  iet  st  is:2dttp
SFX G  t  ot   st  is:0xtta
SFX G  t  0/]| st  is:0xttv
SFX G  dēt žu   dēt is:1vtt0
SFX G  dēt di   dēt is:2xtt0
SFX G  dēt ž    dēt is:3xtt0
SFX G  dēt žam  dēt is:1dtt0
SFX G  dēt žat  dēt is:2dtt0
SFX G  dēt žiet dēt is:2dttp
SFX G  dēt žot  dēt is:0xtta
SFX G  dēt ž/]| dēt is:0xttv
SFX G  tēt šu   tēt is:1vtt0
SFX G  tēt ti   tēt is:2xtt0
SFX G  tēt š    tēt is:3xtt0
SFX G  tēt šam  tēt is:1dtt0
SFX G  tēt šat  tēt is:2dtt0
SFX G  tēt tiet tēt is:2dttp
SFX G  tēt šot  tēt is:0xtta
SFX G  tēt š/]| tēt is:0xttv


SFX H Y 118
SFX H   t   0     [āēīoū]t   is:2vtt0
SFX H   t   jam   [āēīoū]t   is:1dtt0
SFX H   t   jat   [āēīoū]t   is:2dtt0
SFX H   t   jiet  [āēīoū]t   is:2dttp
SFX H   t   jot   [āēīoū]t   is:0xtta
SFX H   t   0/]|  [āēīoū]t   is:0xttv
SFX H   st   šu    [^aieu]st   is:1vtt0
SFX H   t    0     [^aieuū]st  is:2vtt0
SFX H   st   t     [ū]st      is:2vtt0
SFX H   st   š     [^aieu]st   is:3xtt0
SFX H   st   šam   [^aieu]st   is:1dtt0
SFX H   st   šat   [^aieu]st   is:2dtt0
SFX H   st   šot   [^aieu]st   is:0xtta
SFX H   t    iet   [^aieuū]st  is:2dttp
SFX H   st   tiet  [ū]st       is:2dttp
SFX H   st   š/]|  [^aieu]st   is:0xttv
SFX H   ast  odu    ast      is:1vtt0
SFX H   ast  odi    ast      is:2vtt0
SFX H   ast  od     ast      is:3vtt0
SFX H   ast  odam   ast      is:1dtt0
SFX H   ast  odat   ast      is:2dtt0
SFX H   ast  odot   ast      is:0xtta
SFX H   ast  odiet  ast      is:2dttp
SFX H   ast  od/]|  ast      is:0xttv
SFX H   st   šu    [^m]est   is:1vtt0
SFX H   st   t     [^m]est   is:2vtt0
SFX H   st   š     [^m]est   is:3xtt0
SFX H   st   šam   [^m]est   is:1dtt0
SFX H   st   šat   [^m]est   is:2dtt0
SFX H   st   šot   [^m]est   is:0xtta
SFX H   t    iet   [^m]est   is:2dttp
SFX H   st   š/]|  [^m]est   is:0xttv
SFX H   st   tu    [m]est   is:1vtt0
SFX H   st   t     [m]est   is:2vtt0
SFX H   st   tam   [m]est   is:1dtt0
SFX H   st   tat   [m]est   is:2dtt0
SFX H   st   tot   [m]est   is:0xtta
SFX H   st   tiet  [m]est   is:2dttp
SFX H   st   t/]|  [m]est   is:0xttv
SFX H   st   tu   [^mnr]ist   is:1vtt0
SFX H   st   t    [^mnr]ist   is:3xtt0
SFX H   st   tam  [^mnr]ist   is:1dtt0
SFX H   st   tat  [^mnr]ist   is:2dtt0
SFX H   st   tot  [^mnr]ist   is:0xtta
SFX H   st   tiet [^mnr]ist   is:2dttp
SFX H   st   t/]| [^mnr]ist   is:0xttv
SFX H  ist   ītu   [mnr]ist    is:1vtt0
SFX H  ist   īti   [mnr]ist    is:2vtt0
SFX H  ist   īt    [mnr]ist    is:3xtt0
SFX H  ist   ītam  [mnr]ist    is:1dtt0
SFX H  ist   ītat  [mnr]ist    is:2dtt0
SFX H  ist   ītiet [mnr]ist    is:2dttp
SFX H  ist   ītot  [mnr]ist    is:0xtta
SFX H  ist   īt/]| [mnr]ist    is:0xttv
SFX H  ikt   īku    [i]kt   is:1vtt0
SFX H  ikt   īc     [i]kt   is:2vtt0
SFX H  ikt   īk     [i]kt   is:3xtt0
SFX H  ikt   īkam   [i]kt   is:1dtt0
SFX H  ikt   īkat   [i]kt   is:2dtt0
SFX H  ikt   īkot   [i]kt   is:0xtta
SFX H  ikt   īciet  [i]kt   is:2dttp
SFX H  ikt   īk/]|  [i]kt   is:0xttv
SFX H  t  stu   [ru]kt   is:1vtt0
SFX H  t  sti   [ru]kt   is:2vtt0
SFX H  t  st    [ru]kt   is:3xtt0
SFX H  t  stam  [ru]kt   is:1dtt0
SFX H  t  stat  [ru]kt   is:2dtt0
SFX H  t  stot  [ru]kt   is:0xtta
SFX H  t  stiet [ru]kt   is:2dttp
SFX H  t  st/]| [ru]kt   is:0xttv
SFX H  t  stu   gt   is:1vtt0
SFX H  t  sti   gt   is:2vtt0
SFX H  t  st    gt   is:3xtt0
SFX H  t  stam  gt   is:1dtt0
SFX H  t  stat  gt   is:2dtt0
SFX H  t  stot  gt   is:0xtta
SFX H  t  stiet gt   is:2dttp
SFX H  t  st/]| gt   is:0xttv
SFX H ust ūtu    [jsš]ust  is:1vtt0
SFX H ust ūti    [jsš]ust  is:2vtt0
SFX H ust ūt     [jsš]ust  is:3xtt0
SFX H ust ūtam   [jsš]ust  is:1dtt0
SFX H ust ūtat   [jsš]ust  is:2dtt0
SFX H ust ūtiet  [jsš]ust  is:2dttp
SFX H ust ūtot   [jsš]ust  is:0xtta
SFX H ust ūt/]|  [jsš]ust  is:0xttv
SFX H ust ūdu    [z]ust  is:1vtt0
SFX H ust ūdi    [z]ust  is:2vtt0
SFX H ust ūd     [z]ust  is:3xtt0
SFX H ust ūdam   [z]ust  is:1dtt0
SFX H ust ūdat   [z]ust  is:2dtt0
SFX H ust ūdiet  [z]ust  is:2dttp
SFX H ust ūdot   [z]ust  is:0xtta
SFX H ust ūd/]|  [z]ust  is:0xttv
SFX H ust ūstu   [k]ust   is:1vtt0
SFX H ust ūsti   [k]ust   is:2vtt0
SFX H ust ūst    [k]ust   is:3xtt0
SFX H ust ūstam  [k]ust   is:1dtt0
SFX H ust ūstat  [k]ust   is:2dtt0
SFX H ust ūstiet [k]ust   is:2dttp
SFX H ust ūstot  [k]ust   is:0xtta
SFX H ust ūst/]| [k]ust   is:0xttv
SFX H st šu   [a]ust    is:1vtt0
SFX H t  0    [a]ust    is:2vtt0
SFX H st š    [a]ust    is:3xtt0
SFX H st šam  [a]ust    is:1dtt0
SFX H st šat  [a]ust    is:2dtt0
SFX H st iet  [a]ust    is:2dttp
SFX H st šot  [a]ust    is:0xtta
SFX H st š/]| [a]ust    is:0xttv
SFX H t  stu     [r]pt   is:1vtt0
SFX H t  sti     [r]pt   is:2vtt0
SFX H t  st      [r]pt   is:3xtt0
SFX H t  stam    [r]pt   is:1dtt0
SFX H t  stat    [r]pt   is:2dtt0
SFX H t  stiet   [r]pt   is:2dttp
SFX H t  stot    [r]pt   is:0xtta
SFX H t  st/]|   [r]pt   is:0xttv
